Massachusetts, session 194th, H385.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 9 (3) of General Laws, Chapter 93A, as most recently amended, is 
amended by inserting “or arbitration award” after the word “judgment” in the fourth sentence. 
SECTION 2. Section 11 of General Laws, Chapter 93A, as most recently amended, is 
amended by inserting “or arbitration award” after the word “judgment” in the second sentence of 
the fifth paragraph.